West Virginia, session 2025, SB207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8D. CHILD ABUSE. §61-8D-4b. Definition; prohibition on state funding for drag shows; prohibition on minors at drag shows; penalties. (a) Drag shows are defined as any event that involve adults engaging in entertainment put on by drag artists, or people who put on clothes and makeup that amplify the appearance of gender to impersonate men or women.(b) No funds from governmental entities in West Virginia may be used for organizing, promoting, or hosting drag shows for any reason. Any governmental entity found to be in violation of this section may have their funding restricted.(c) All minors in West Virginia are prohibited from being involved in drag shows for any reason. Additionally, drag shows may not be held in the presence of minors, with the responsibility of checking the appropriate age of attendees to fall upon the organization or group holding the drag show.(d) Any adult or parental guardian of a minor who violates subsection (c) of this section, or any entity hosting a drag show in violation of the provisions of this section, may be required to complete parenting classes, substance abuse counseling, anger management counseling, or other appropriate services, or any combination thereof, as determined by Department of Human Services, Bureau for Children and Families through its services assessment evaluation, which shall be submitted to the court of conviction upon written request.